Illinois, session 104th, SB2389.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-55 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-55)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.3-55)7    Sec. 3-55. Multistate exemption. To prevent actual or 8likely multistate taxation, the tax imposed by this Act does 9not apply to the use of tangible personal property in this 10State under the following circumstances:11    (a) The use, in this State, of tangible personal property 12acquired outside this State by a nonresident individual and 13brought into this State by the individual for his or her own 14use while temporarily within this State or while passing 15through this State.16    (b) (Blank).17    (c) The use, in this State, by owners or lessors, lessees, 18or shippers of tangible personal property that is utilized by 19interstate carriers for hire for use as rolling stock moving 20in interstate commerce as long as so used by the interstate 21carriers for hire, and equipment operated by a 22telecommunications provider, licensed as a common carrier by 23the Federal Communications Commission, which is permanently   SB2389- 2 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1installed in or affixed to aircraft moving in interstate 2commerce.3    (d) The use, in this State, of tangible personal property 4that is acquired outside this State and caused to be brought 5into this State by a person who has already paid a tax in 6another State in respect to the sale, purchase, or use of that 7property, to the extent of the amount of the tax properly due 8and paid in the other State.9    (e) The temporary storage, in this State, of tangible 10personal property that is acquired outside this State and 11that, after being brought into this State and stored here 12temporarily, is used solely outside this State or is 13physically attached to or incorporated into other tangible 14personal property that is used solely outside this State, or 15is altered by converting, fabricating, manufacturing, 16printing, processing, or shaping, and, as altered, is used 17solely outside this State.18    (f) The temporary storage in this State of building 19materials and fixtures that are acquired either in this State 20or outside this State by an Illinois registered combination 21retailer and construction contractor, and that the purchaser 22thereafter uses outside this State by incorporating that 23property into real estate located outside this State.24    (g) The use or purchase of tangible personal property by a 25common carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 26possession of the property in Illinois, and that transports   SB2389- 3 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 2transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a standard 3uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the property as 4the shipper or consignor of the property to a destination 5outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.6    (h) Except as provided in subsection (h-1), the use, in 7this State, of a motor vehicle that was sold in this State to a 8nonresident, even though the motor vehicle is delivered to the 9nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not to be 10titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is issued to 11the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 of the Illinois 12Vehicle Code or if the nonresident purchaser has vehicle 13registration plates to transfer to the motor vehicle upon 14returning to his or her home state. The issuance of the 15drive-away permit or having the out-of-state registration 16plates to be transferred shall be prima facie evidence that 17the motor vehicle will not be titled in this State.18    (h-1) The exemption under subsection (h) does not apply if 19the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does not 20allow a reciprocal exemption for the use in that state of a 21motor vehicle sold and delivered in that state to an Illinois 22resident but titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this 23Act on the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident 24of another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 25shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax on 26taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is a   SB2389- 4 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax that 2would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the time of the 3sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, signed under 4penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to title the vehicle 5in the state in which the purchaser is a resident within 30 6days after the sale and of the fact of the payment to the State 7of Illinois of tax in an amount equivalent to the state's rate 8of tax on taxable property in his or her state of residence and 9shall submit the statement to the appropriate tax collection 10agency in his or her state of residence. In addition, the 11retailer must retain a signed copy of the statement in his or 12her records. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 13require the removal of the vehicle from this state following 14the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in the purchaser's 15state of residence if the purchaser titles the vehicle in his 16or her state of residence within 30 days after the date of 17sale. The tax collected under this Act in accordance with this 18subsection (h-1) shall be proportionately distributed as if 19the tax were collected at the 6.25% general rate imposed under 20this Act. 21    (h-2) The following exemptions apply with respect to 22certain aircraft:23        (1) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 24    this Act on the purchase of an aircraft, as defined in 25    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 26    following conditions are met:  SB2389- 5 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1            (A) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 2        after the later of either the issuance of the final 3        billing for the purchase of the aircraft or the 4        authorized approval for return to service, completion 5        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 6        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 7        required by 14 C.F.R. 91.407;8            (B) the aircraft is not based or registered in 9        this State after the purchase of the aircraft; and10            (C) the purchaser provides the Department with a 11        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 12        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 13        this item (1) are met. The certificate must also 14        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 15        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 16        titled or registered, the address of the primary 17        physical location of the aircraft, and other 18        information that the Department may reasonably 19        require.20        (2) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 21    this Act on the use of an aircraft, as defined in Section 3 22    of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, that is temporarily 23    located in this State for the purpose of a prepurchase 24    evaluation if all of the following conditions are met:25            (A) the aircraft is not based or registered in 26        this State after the prepurchase evaluation; and  SB2389- 6 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1            (B) the purchaser provides the Department with a 2        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 3        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of 4        this item (2) are met. The certificate must also 5        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 6        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 7        titled or registered, the address of the primary 8        physical location of the aircraft, and other 9        information that the Department may reasonably 10        require.11        (3) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed under 12    this Act on the use of an aircraft, as defined in Section 3 13    of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, that is temporarily 14    located in this State for the purpose of a post-sale 15    customization if all of the following conditions are met:16            (A) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 17        after the authorized approval for return to service, 18        completion of the maintenance record entry, and 19        completion of the test flight and ground test for 20        inspection, as required by 14 C.F.R. 91.407;21            (B) the aircraft is not based or registered in 22        this State either before or after the post-sale 23        customization; and24            (C) the purchaser provides the Department with a 25        signed and dated certification, on a form prescribed 26        by the Department, certifying that the requirements of   SB2389- 7 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1        this item (3) are met. The certificate must also 2        include the name and address of the purchaser, the 3        address of the location where the aircraft is to be 4        titled or registered, the address of the primary 5        physical location of the aircraft, and other 6        information that the Department may reasonably 7        require.8    If tax becomes due under this subsection (h-2) because of 9the purchaser's use of the aircraft in this State, the 10purchaser shall file a return with the Department and pay the 11tax on the fair market value of the aircraft. This return and 12payment of the tax must be made no later than 30 days after the 13aircraft is used in a taxable manner in this State. The tax is 14based on the fair market value of the aircraft on the date that 15it is first used in a taxable manner in this State.16    For purposes of this subsection (h-2):17    "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or otherwise 18used, excluding post-sale customizations as defined in this 19Section, for 10 or more days in each 12-month period 20immediately following the date of the sale of the aircraft.21    "Post-sale customization" means any improvement, 22maintenance, or repair that is performed on an aircraft 23following a transfer of ownership of the aircraft.24    "Prepurchase evaluation" means an examination of an 25aircraft to provide a potential purchaser with information 26relevant to the potential purchase.  SB2389- 8 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    "Registered in this State" means an aircraft registered 2with the Department of Transportation, Aeronautics Division, 3or titled or registered with the Federal Aviation 4Administration to an address located in this State. 5    This subsection (h-2) is exempt from the provisions of 6Section 3-90. 7    (i) Beginning July 1, 1999, the use, in this State, of fuel 8acquired outside this State and brought into this State in the 9fuel supply tanks of locomotives engaged in freight hauling 10and passenger service for interstate commerce. This subsection 11is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (j) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 132016, and beginning again on July 1, 2025 and through June 30, 142030, the use of tangible personal property purchased from an 15Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 16purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of 17the property in Illinois, temporarily store the property in 18Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently transporting it 19outside this State for use or consumption thereafter solely 20outside this State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, 21fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated 22into other tangible personal property to be transported 23outside this State and thereafter used or consumed solely 24outside this State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to 25rules adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 26Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing   SB2389- 9 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 2this subsection (j). The permit issued under this subsection 3(j) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the manner 4specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to purchase 5tangible personal property from a retailer exempt from the 6taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain all 7necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 8consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 9the State of Illinois.10(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.) 11    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 12Section 3-45 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 110/3-45)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.33-45)14    Sec. 3-45. Multistate exemption. To prevent actual or 15likely multistate taxation, the tax imposed by this Act does 16not apply to the use of tangible personal property in this 17State under the following circumstances:18    (a) The use, in this State, of property acquired outside 19this State by a nonresident individual and brought into this 20State by the individual for his or her own use while 21temporarily within this State or while passing through this 22State.23    (b) The use, in this State, of property that is acquired 24outside this State and that is moved into this State for use as   SB2389- 10 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1rolling stock moving in interstate commerce.2    (c) The use, in this State, of property that is acquired 3outside this State and caused to be brought into this State by 4a person who has already paid a tax in another state in respect 5to the sale, purchase, or use of that property, to the extent 6of the amount of the tax properly due and paid in the other 7state.8    (d) The temporary storage, in this State, of property that 9is acquired outside this State and that after being brought 10into this State and stored here temporarily, is used solely 11outside this State or is physically attached to or 12incorporated into other property that is used solely outside 13this State, or is altered by converting, fabricating, 14manufacturing, printing, processing, or shaping, and, as 15altered, is used solely outside this State.16    (e) Beginning July 1, 1999, the use, in this State, of fuel 17acquired outside this State and brought into this State in the 18fuel supply tanks of locomotives engaged in freight hauling 19and passenger service for interstate commerce. This subsection 20is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.21    (f) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 222016, and beginning again on July 1, 2025 and through June 30, 232030, the use of tangible personal property purchased from an 24Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 25purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of 26the property in Illinois, temporarily store the property in   SB2389- 11 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently transporting it 2outside this State for use or consumption thereafter solely 3outside this State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, 4fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated 5into other tangible personal property to be transported 6outside this State and thereafter used or consumed solely 7outside this State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to 8rules adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 9Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 10with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 11this subsection (f). The permit issued under this subsection 12(f) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the manner 13specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to purchase 14tangible personal property from a retailer exempt from the 15taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain all 16necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 17consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 18the State of Illinois.19(Source: P.A. 97-73, eff. 6-30-11.) 20    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 21changing Section 3-5 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)23    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 24property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:  SB2389- 12 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 2association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 3than a limited liability company, that is organized and 4operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 5benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 6property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 7of resale by the enterprise.8    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 9Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 10operating, or promoting the county fair.11    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 12or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 13by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 14under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 15is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 16support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 17services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 18music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 19orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 20organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 21and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 22effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 23otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 24purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 25by the Department.26    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver   SB2389- 13 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 2United States of America, or the government of any foreign 3country, and bullion.4    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 8purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 9primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 10chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 11chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 12immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 13July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 14in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 15exemption under Section 2 of this Act.16    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 17organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 18located in Illinois.19    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 20including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 21purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 22State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 23replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 24machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 25implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 26Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural   SB2389- 14 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 2to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 3Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 4registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 5polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 6overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 7equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 8tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 9motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 10on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 11of the tender is separately stated.12    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 13farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 14installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 15limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 16or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 17limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 18software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 19such equipment.20    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 21sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 22computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 23facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 24to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 25crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 26agricultural chemicals.   SB2389- 15 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 2also includes electrical power generation equipment used 3primarily for production agriculture. 4    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 53-55.6    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 7to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 8to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 9conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 10destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 11the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 12domestic stopovers.13    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 14to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 15used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 16its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 17engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 18United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 19at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 20origination to the city of final destination on the same 21aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 22that aircraft. 23    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 24stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 25food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 26service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a   SB2389- 16 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 2in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 3beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 4imposed.5    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 6and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 7rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 8pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 9(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 10lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 11exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 12machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 13motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 14Vehicle Code.15    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 16repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 17that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 18to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 19photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.20    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 21mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 22reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 23equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 24excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 25Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 26Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim   SB2389- 17 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 2(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 3during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 416, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).5    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 6food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 7premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 8soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 9consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 10drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 11materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 12use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 13assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 14resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 15the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 16in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 17Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.18    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 19for direct agricultural production.20    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 21meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 22Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 23Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 24Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 25racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 26provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for   SB2389- 18 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 21995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 3January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 4such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 5ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 695-88).7    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 8any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 9analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 10who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 11executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 12hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 13identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 14the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.15    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 16property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 17effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 18has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 19by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 20Occupation Tax Act.21    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 22December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 23before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 24for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 25disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 26manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a   SB2389- 19 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 2that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 3number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 4who reside within the declared disaster area.5    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 6December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 7before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 8the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 9including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 10access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 11water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 12purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 13facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 14State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 15Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 16in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 17disaster.18    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 19"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 20in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 21provisions of Section 3-55.22    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 231-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 24corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 25foundation, or institution that is determined by the 26Department to be organized and operated exclusively for   SB2389- 20 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 2corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 3foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 4for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 5schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 6useful branches of learning by methods common to public 7schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 8intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 9schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 10organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 11study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 12individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 13technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 14occupation.15    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 16including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 17benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 18a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 19the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 20district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 21parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 22does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 23private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 24entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 25another individual or entity that sold the property for the 26purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits   SB2389- 21 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 2exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.3    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 42001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 5serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 6other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 7Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 8and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 9amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 10paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 11commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 12paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.13    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 14Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 15utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 16diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 17a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 18longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 19hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 20identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 21the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 22from the provisions of Section 3-55.23    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 24Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 25leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 26executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a   SB2389- 22 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 2identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 3the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 4from the provisions of Section 3-55.5    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 62016, and beginning again on June 30, 2025 and through June 30, 72030, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 8retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 9activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 10in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 11for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 12State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 13State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 14or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 15tangible personal property to be transported outside this 16State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 17State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 18adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 19Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 20with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 21this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 22(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 23manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 24purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 25from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 26all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and   SB2389- 23 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 2the State of Illinois.3    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 4used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 5supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 6Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 7corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 8under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 9paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 10    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 11public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1211-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 13constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 14only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 15transferred to the municipality without any further 16consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 17of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 18retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 19instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 20connection with the development of the municipal convention 21hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 22corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 23Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 24of Section 3-55. 25    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 26December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components,   SB2389- 24 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 2of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 3repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 4includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 5refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 6maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 7exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 8components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 9replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 10power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 11installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 12supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 13sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 14latex gloves, and protective films. 15    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 1631, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 17qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 18modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 19or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 20Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 21repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 22have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 23accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 24The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 25commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 26service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part   SB2389- 25 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 2through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 3transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 4(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 5replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 6hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 7approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 8Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 9operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 10Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 11and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 12regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 13of item (A).14    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 1598-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 16General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 17applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 182024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 19taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 20or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 21effective date of Public Act 101-629).22    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 232026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 24    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 25who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 26paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.   SB2389- 26 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 2construction or operation of a data center that has been 3granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 4Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 5personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 6tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 7of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 8have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 91, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 10obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 11equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 12supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 13purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 14qualified. 15    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 16grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 17qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 18Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 19Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 20    For the purposes of this item (32): 21        "Data center" means a building or a series of 22    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 23    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 24    the State of Illinois. 25        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 26    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and   SB2389- 27 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 2    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 3    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 4    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 5    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 6    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 7    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 8    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 9    systems; other cabling; and other data center 10    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 11    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 12    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 13    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 14    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 15    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 16    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 17    personal property; and all other tangible personal 18    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 19    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 20    property" also includes building materials physically 21    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 22    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 23    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 24    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 25    Economic Opportunity. 26    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section   SB2389- 28 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b13-55. 2    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 3collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 4item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 5used in this item (33): 6        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 7    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 8    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 9    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 10    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 11    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 12    time of sale. 13        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 14    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 15    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 16    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 17    milk until it is ready for consumption. 18        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 19    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 20    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 21    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 22    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 23    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 24    milk storage bags. 25        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 26    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the   SB2389- 29 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 2    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 3    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 4    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 5    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 6    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 7    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 8    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 9    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 10    or distributor. 11        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 12    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 13    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 14    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 15    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 16    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 17    manufacturer or distributor. 18    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 19the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 20Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 21Section 3-55.22    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 23property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 24forces of the United States who presents valid military 25identification and purchases the property using a form of 26payment where the federal government is the payor. The member   SB2389- 30 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 2prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 3transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 4paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 5the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 6years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 7States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 8Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 9Section 3-55. 10    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 11to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 12intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 13Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 14Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 15paragraph (36) (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 163-55. 17    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 18in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 19transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 20or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 21Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 22Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 23Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 24Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 25an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 26Facilities Act. This item (37) (36) is exempt from the   SB2389- 31 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1provisions of Section 3-55. 2    (38) (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 3in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 4consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 5alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 6use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 7prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) (37) is 8exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 9    (39) (36) The lease of the following tangible personal 10property:11        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 12    that meets the following requirements:13            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 14        by the licensor and the customer;15                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 16            customer accepts the license by means of an 17            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 18            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 19            the license will comply with this requirement;20                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 21            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 22            agree" does not comply with this requirement;23            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 24        use of the software;25            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 26        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third   SB2389- 32 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1        party (except to a related party) without the 2        permission and continued control of the licensor;3            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 4        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 5        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 6        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 7        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 8        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 9        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 10        the licensor; and11            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 12        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 13        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 14        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 15        forth in the license agreement; and16        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 17    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 18    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 19    January 1, 2023. 20(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 21Section 70-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 2275-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 23Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, 24eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 267-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995,   SB2389- 33 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 3by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 4    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)5    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 6the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 7lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 8from the tax imposed by this Act:9        (1) Farm chemicals.10        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 11    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 12    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 13    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 14    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 15    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 16    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 17    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 18    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 19    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 20    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 21    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 22    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 23    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 24    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery   SB2389- 34 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 2    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 3    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 4    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 5    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 6    stated.7        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 8    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 9    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 10    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 11    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 12    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 13    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 14    mapping systems, and other such equipment.15        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 16    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 17    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 18    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 19    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 20    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 21    diets and agricultural chemicals. 22        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 23    equipment also includes electrical power generation 24    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 25        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 26    2-70.  SB2389- 35 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 2    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 3    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 4    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 5    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 6    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 7    or resale.8        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 9    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 10    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 11    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 12    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 13    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 14    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 15    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 16    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 17    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 18    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 19    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 20    exemption under paragraph (14).21        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 22    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 23    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 24    provisions of Section 2-70.25        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 26    student organization affiliated with an elementary or   SB2389- 36 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    secondary school located in Illinois.2        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 3    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 4    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.5        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 6    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 7    the county fair.8        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 9    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 10    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 11    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 12    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 13    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 14    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 15    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 16    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 17    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 18    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 19    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 20    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 21    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 22    an active identification number issued by the Department.23        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 24    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 25    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 26    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for   SB2389- 37 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 2    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 3    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.4        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 5    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 6    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 7    institution organized and operated exclusively for 8    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 9    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 10    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 11    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 12    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 13    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 14    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 15    limited liability company is organized and operated 16    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 17    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 18    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 19    active identification number issued by the Department.20        (12) (Blank).21        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 22    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 23    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 24    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 25    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 26    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of   SB2389- 38 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 2    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 3    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 4    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 5    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 6    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 7    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 8    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 9    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 10    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 11    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 12    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 13    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 14    or not. 15        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 16    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 17    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 18    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 19    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 20    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 21    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 22    moving in interstate commerce.23        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 24    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 25    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 26    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether   SB2389- 39 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 2    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 3    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 4    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 5    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 6    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 7    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 8    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 9    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 10    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 11    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 12    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 13    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 14    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 15    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 16    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 17    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 18    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 19    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 20    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 21    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 22    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.23        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 24    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 25    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 26    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a   SB2389- 40 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 2    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 3    food or beverage function with respect to which the 4    service charge is imposed. 5        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 6    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 7    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 8    of Section 2-70. 9        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 10    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 11    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 12    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 13    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 14    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 15    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 16    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.17        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 18    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 19    government of the United States of America, or the 20    government of any foreign country, and bullion.21        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 22    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 23    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 24    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 25    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 26    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual   SB2389- 41 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 2    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 3    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 4    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.5        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 6    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 7    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 8    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 9    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 10    purchased for lease.11        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 12    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 13    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 14    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 15    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 16    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 17    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 18    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 19    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 20    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 21    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 22    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).23        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 24    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 25    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 26    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a   SB2389- 42 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    flight destined for or returning from a location or 2    locations outside the United States without regard to 3    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.4        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 5    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 6    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 7    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 8    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 9    in trade between the United States and any of its 10    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 11    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 12    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 13    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 14        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 15    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 16    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 17    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.18        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 19    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 20    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 21    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 22    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 23    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.24        (25) Except as provided in item (25-5) of this 25    Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 26    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to   SB2389- 43 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 2    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 3    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 4    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 5    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 6    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 7    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 8    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 9    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 10    titled in this State.11        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 12    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 13    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 14    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 15    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 16    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 17    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 18    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 19    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 20    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 21    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 22    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 23    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 24    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 25    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 26    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount   SB2389- 44 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 2    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 3    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 4    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 5    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 6    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 7    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 8    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 9    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 10    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 11    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 12    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 13    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 14    general rate imposed under this Act. 15        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 16    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 17    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 18    following conditions are met:19            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 20        after the later of either the issuance of the final 21        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 22        authorized approval for return to service, completion 23        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 24        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 25        required by 14 CFR 91.407;26            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in   SB2389- 45 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and2            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 3        records and provides to the Department a signed and 4        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 5        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 6        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 7        certificate must also include the name and address of 8        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 9        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 10        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 11        other information that the Department may reasonably 12        require.13        For purposes of this item (25-7):14        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 15    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 16    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 17    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 18    of the aircraft.19        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 20    registered with the Department of Transportation, 21    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 22    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 23    this State.24        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 25    Section 2-70. 26        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of   SB2389- 46 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    livestock for direct agricultural production.2        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 3    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 4    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 5    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 6    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 7    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 8    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 9    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 10    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 11    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 12    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 13    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 14    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 15    95-88).16        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 17    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 18    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 19    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 20    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 21    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 22    exemption identification number by the Department under 23    Section 1g of this Act.24        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 25    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 26    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental   SB2389- 47 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 2    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 3    of this Act.4        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 6    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 7    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 8    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 9    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 10    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 11    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 12    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 13    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 14    declared disaster area.15        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 16    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 17    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 18    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 19    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 20    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 21    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 22    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 23    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 24    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 25    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 26    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the   SB2389- 48 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.2        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 3    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 4    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 5    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.6        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 7    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 8    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 9    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 10    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 11    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 12    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 13    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 14    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 15    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 16    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 17    learning by methods common to public schools and that 18    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 19    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 20    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 21    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 22    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 23    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 24    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 25    occupation.26        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property,   SB2389- 49 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 2    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 3    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 4    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 5    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 6    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 7    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 8    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 9    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 10    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 11    another individual or entity that sold the property for 12    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 13    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 14    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.15        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 16    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 17    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 18    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 19    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 20    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 21    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 22    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 23    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 24    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 25    from the provisions of Section 2-70.26        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30,   SB2389- 50 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 2    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 3    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 4    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 5    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 6    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 7    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 8    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 9    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 10    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 11    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 12    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 13    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.14        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 15    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 16    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 17    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 18    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 19    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 20    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 21    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 22    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 23    of Section 2-70.24        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 25    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 26    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the   SB2389- 51 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 2    active tax exemption identification number by the 3    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 4    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.5        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 6    2016, and beginning again on July 1, 2025 and through June 7    30, 2030, tangible personal property purchased from an 8    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 9    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 10    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 11    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 12    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 13    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 14    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 15    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 16    personal property to be transported outside this State and 17    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 18    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 19    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 20    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 21    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 22    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 23    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 24    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 25    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 26    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall   SB2389- 52 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 2    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 3    property outside of the State of Illinois.4        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 5    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 6    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 7    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 8    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 9    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 10    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 11    provisions of Section 2-70. 12        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 13    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 14    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 15    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 16    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 17    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 18    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 19    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 20    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 21    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 22    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 23    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 24    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 25    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 26    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape,   SB2389- 53 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 2    latex gloves, and protective films. 3        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 4    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 5    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 6    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 7    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 8    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 9    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 10    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 11    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 12    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 13    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 14    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 15    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 16    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 17    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 18    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 19    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 20    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 21    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 22    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 23    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 24    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 25    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 26    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to   SB2389- 54 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 2    item (A).3        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 4    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 5    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 6    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 7    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 8    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 9    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 10    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 11    Public Act 101-629).12        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 13    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 14    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 15    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 16    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 17    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 18    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 19    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 20    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 21    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 22    corporation in connection with the development of the 23    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 24    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 25    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 26    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.   SB2389- 55 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 2    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 3        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 4    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 5    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 6    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 7    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 8    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 9    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 10    the provisions of Section 2-70.11        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 12    construction or operation of a data center that has been 13    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 14    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 15    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 16    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 17    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 18    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 19    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 20    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 21    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 22    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 23    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 24    or leased in the original investment that would have 25    qualified. 26        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity   SB2389- 56 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 2    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 3    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 4    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 5    Illinois. 6        For the purposes of this item (44): 7            "Data center" means a building or a series of 8        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 9        working servers in one physical location or multiple 10        sites within the State of Illinois. 11            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 12        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 13        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 14        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 15        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 16        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 17        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 18        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 19        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 20        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 21        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 22        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 23        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 24        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 25        any of the foregoing, including installation, 26        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of   SB2389- 57 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 2        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 3        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 4        property; and all other tangible personal property 5        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 6        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 7        property" also includes building materials physically 8        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 9        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 10        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 11        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 12        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 13        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 14    Section 2-70. 15        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 16    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 17    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 18    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 19    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 20    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 21    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 22    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 23    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 24    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 25    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 26    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6   SB2389- 58 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 2    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 3    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 4    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 5    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 6        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 7    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 8    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 9    2-70. As used in this item (46): 10        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 11    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 12    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 13    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 14    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 15    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 16    time of sale. 17        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 18    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 19    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 20    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 21    milk until it is ready for consumption. 22        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 23    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 24    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 25    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 26    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps   SB2389- 59 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 2    milk storage bags. 3        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 4    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 5    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 6    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 7    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 8    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 9    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 10    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 11    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 12    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 13    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 14    or distributor. 15        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 16    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 17    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 18    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 19    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 20    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 21    manufacturer or distributor. 22        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 23    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 24    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 25    provisions of Section 2-70. 26        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal   SB2389- 60 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 2    forces of the United States who presents valid military 3    identification and purchases the property using a form of 4    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 5    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 6    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 7    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 8    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 9    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 10    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 11    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 12    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 13    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 14        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 15    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 16    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 17    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 18    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 19    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 20    the provisions of Section 2-70. 21        (50) (49) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further 22    defined in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that 23    is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 24    than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused 25    with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that 26    has been prepared for immediate consumption). This item   SB2389- 61 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    (50) (49) is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 2        (51) (49) Gross receipts from the lease of the 3    following tangible personal property:4            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 5        license that meets the following requirements:6                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 7            signed by the licensor and the customer;8                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 9                customer accepts the license by means of an 10                electronic signature that is verifiable and 11                can be authenticated and is attached to or 12                made part of the license will comply with this 13                requirement;14                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 15                customer electronically accepts the terms by 16                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 17                requirement;18                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 19            and use of the software;20                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 21            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 22            third party (except to a related party) without 23            the permission and continued control of the 24            licensor;25                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 26            another copy at minimal or no charge if the   SB2389- 62 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1            customer loses or damages the software, or of 2            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 3            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 4            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 5            books and records, or supported by a notarized 6            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 7            licensor; and8                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 9            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 10            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 11            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 12            without being set forth in the license agreement; 13            and14            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 15        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 16        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 17        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 18(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-634, eff. 8-27-21; 19102-700, Article 70, Section 70-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, 20Article 75, Section 75-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-813, eff. 215-13-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, Section 225-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 236-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 24eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 25103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 268-9-24; revised 11-26-24.)   SB2389- 63 -LRB104 10643 HLH 20720 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.